Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1914.03
Unlicensed child care; violations; penalty; county attorney; duties.

(1) Any person violating the Child Care Licensing Act by providing unlicensed child care when a license is required is guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor. Each day the violation continues shall be a separate offense.

(2) The county attorney of the county in which any provision of unlicensed child care in violation of the act is occurring shall, when notified of such violation by the department or a law enforcement agency, cause appropriate proceedings under subsection (1) of this section to be instituted and pursued in a court of competent jurisdiction.

Laws 1997, LB 310, § 10;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 77.